Washington statutes.
RCW 2.04.020

Court of record—General powers.

The supreme court shall be a court of record, and shall be vested with all power and authority necessary to carry into complete execution all its judgments, decrees and determinations in all matters within its jurisdiction, according to the rules and principles of the common law, and the Constitution and laws of this state.

[ 1890 p 323 s 10; RRS s 2.]

NOTES:

Courts of record: State Constitution Art. 4 s 11.

Judicial power, where vested: State Constitution Art. 4 s 1.